Washington statutes.
RCW 35.90.060

Geographic restrictions on license requirement.

Cities may not require a person to obtain or renew a general business license unless the person engages in business within its respective city. For the purposes of this section, a person may not be considered to be engaging in business within a city unless the person is subject to the taxing jurisdiction of a city under the standards established for interstate commerce under the commerce clause of the United States Constitution.

[ 2017 c 209 s 6.]